Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2011
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Certificate of existence or authorization.

(1) Anyone may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic corporation or a certificate of authorization for a foreign corporation.

(2) A certificate of existence or authorization shall set forth:

(a) The domestic corporation's corporate name or the foreign corporation's corporate name used in this state;

(b) That (i) the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state, the date of its incorporation, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual or (ii) the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this state;

(c) That no occupation taxes due from and assessable against the corporation are unpaid and have become delinquent;

(d) That no annual report required to be forwarded by the corporation to the Secretary of State has become delinquent; and

(e) That articles of dissolution have not been filed.

(3) Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this state.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 11.